Massachusetts, session 194th, H1081.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 167 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 52. In the event of a finding by a bank of fraudulent charges on a customer’s
account, the bank shall reimburse the customer any money lost by the customer as a result of the
fraudulent charges within 30 days. The failure of a bank to reimburse a customer for fraudulent
charges shall be an unfair practice under section 2D.
of 1